Utah statutes.
54-4-39.    Natural gas derived from new technologies -- Long-term
contracts.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Coal-to-liquid" means the process of converting coal into a liquid
synthetic fuel.
(b)  "Long-term contract" means a contract greater than five years in
duration, but no greater than ten years in duration.
(c)  "Oil shale" means a group of fine black to dark brown shales containing
bituminous material that yields petroleum upon distillation.
(d)  "Tar sands" means impregnated sands that yield mixtures of liquid
hydrocarbon and require further processing other than mechanical blending
before becoming finished petroleum products.
(2)  The commission shall approve a long-term contract for the sale of natural
gas derived from coal-to-liquid, oil shale, or tar sands technology to a
utility if the commission considers the contract prudent.
